da: Velegnet til fugletype: Solsort; Munk; Blåmejse; Undulat; Kanariefugl; Bogfinke; Nymfeparakit; Tyrkerdue; Finke; Stillits; Musvit; Grønirisk; Gråspurv; Dværgpapegøjer; Ara; Parakit; Papegøje; Rødhals; Spinus; Sangdrossel; Stær; Andet
th: เหมาะสำหรับประเภทนก: นกแบล็กเบิร์ด; นกแบล็กแคป; นกติ๊ดสีน้ำเงิน; นกหงส์หยก; นกคานารี่; นกจาบปีกอ่อนหัวเทาอกชมพู; นกคอกคาทีล; นกเขาแขก; ฟินช์; นกโกลด์ฟินช์; นกติ๊ดใหญ่; นกกรีนฟินช์; นกกระจอกใหญ่; นกเลิฟเบิร์ด; นกมาคอว์; นกพาราคีท; นกแก้ว; นกโรบิน; นกซิสคิน; นกเดินดง; นกเอี้ยงและนกกิ้งโครง; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 适用鸟类: 乌鸫; 乌冠林莺; 蓝山雀; 虎皮鹦鹉; 金丝雀; 苍头燕雀; 澳洲鹦鹉; 斑颈鸠; 雀; 金翅雀; 大山雀; 绿金翅雀; 家麻雀; 爱情鸟; 金刚鹦鹉; 长尾小鹦鹉; 鹦鹉; 知更鸟; 黄雀; 歌鸫; 椋鸟; 其他
en: Suitable for bird type: Blackbird; Blackcap; Blue tit; Budgie; Canary; Chaffinch; Cockatiel; Collared dove; Finch; Goldfinch; Great tit; Greenfinch; House sparrow; Lovebird; Macaw; Parakeet; Parrot; Robin; Siskin; Song thrush; Starling; Other
pt-PT: Adequado para tipo de pássaro: Melro-preto; Toutinegra-de-cabeça-preta; Chapim-azul; Periquito-australiano; Canário; Tentilhão-comum; Calopsita; Rola-turca; Tentilhão; Pintassilgo; Chapim-real; Verdilhão; Pardal-doméstico; Agapornis; Arara; Periquito; Papagaio; Tordo-americano; Lugre; Tordo-comum; Esturnídeo; Outro
vi: Phù hợp với loại chim: Chim sáo; Chim bông lau; Sẻ ngô xanh; Vẹt yến phụng; Chim yến hót; Chim mai hoa; Vẹt Cockatiel; Cu vòng cổ; Chim sẻ; Sẻ thông vàng; Bạc má lớn; Sẻ lục; Sẻ nhà; Chi Két mẫu đơn; Vẹt Macaw; Vẹt đuôi dài; Vẹt; Chim cổ đỏ; Chim hoàng yến; Chim hét nhạc; Chim sáo; Khác
pt-BR: Adequado para tipo de pássaro: Melro-preto; Toutinegra; Chapim-azul; Periquito-australiano; Canário; Tentilhão; Calopsita; Pomba de colarinho; Tentilhão; Pintassilgo; Chapim-real; Verdilhão; Pardal; Agapone; Arara; Periquito; Papagaio; Pisco-de-peito-ruivo; Lugre; Tordo; Esturnídeos; Outro
it: Tipo di uccello ideale: Merlo; Capinera; Cinciarella; Pappagallino; Canarino; Fringuello; Calopsitta; Tortora dal collare; Fringuello; Cardellino; Cinciallegra; Verdone; Passero domestico; Inseparabile; Ara; Parrocchetto; Pappagallo; Pettirosso; Lucherino; Tordo bottaccio; Storno; Altro
nb: Egnet for fugletype: Svarttrost; Munk; Blåmeis; Undulat; Kanarifugl; Bokfink; Kakadu; Kragedue; Fink; Gullfink; Pommemeis; Grønnfink; Gråspurv; Dvergpapegøye; Ara; Parakitt; Papegøye; Rødstrupe; Sisik; Sangtrost; Stær; Annen
sv: Lämplig för fågeltyp: Koltrast; Svarthätta; Blåmes; Undulat; Kanariefågel; Bofink; Nymfkakadua; Turkduva; Fink; Steglits; Talgoxe; Grönfink; Gråsparv; Dvärgpapegoja; Arapapegoja; Parakit; Papegoja; Rödhake; Spinus; Sångtrast; Stare; Annat
ro-RO: Potrivit pentru tipul de păsări: Mierlă; Silvie cu cap negru; Pițigoi albastru; Budgie; Canar; Cinteză; Papagal nimfă; Guguștiuc; Fringilide; Sticlete; Pițigoi mare; Verdele; Vrabia de casă; Pasărea iubirii; Macaw; Peruș; Papagal; Măcăleandru; Scatiu; Sturz cântător; Graur; Altele
fr: Convient au type d’oiseau: Merle; Fauvette à tête noire; Mésange bleue; Perruche ondulée; Canari; Pinson; Calopsitte; Tourterelle à collier; Pinson; Chardonneret; Mésange charbonnière; Verdier; Moineau domestique; Inséparable; Ara; Perruche; Perroquet; Robin; Siskin; Grive musicienne; Étourneau; Autre
tr: Kuş Tipine Uygun: Karatavuk; Karabaşlık; Mavi baştankara; Küçük papağan; Kanarya; İspinoz; Sultan papağanı; Yakalı güvercin; İspinoz; Saka kuşu; Büyük baştankara; Yeşil ispinoz; Evcil kırlangıç; Cennet papağanları; Amerika papağanı; Muhabbet kuşu; Papağan; Kızılgerdan; Şişkin; Öter ardıç; Sığırcık; Diğer
nl: Geschikt voor vogeltype: Merel; Zwartkop; Pimpelmees; Parkietje; Kanarie; Vink; Valkparkiet; Gekraagde duif; Vink; Distelvink; Koolmees; Groenling; Huismus; Dwergpapegaai; Ara; Parkiet; Papegaai; Roodborstje; Sijs; Zanglijster; Spreeuw; Andere
es: Adecuado para tipo de pájaro: Mirlo; Alondra; Alionín; Periquito; Canario; Pinzón; Cacatúa; Tórtola turca; Pinzón; Jilguero; Carbonero común; Verderón común; Gorrión común; Periquitos; Guacamaya; Periquito; Papagayo; Petirrojo; Lúgano; Zorzal común; Estornino pinto; Otros
sl-SI: Primerno za vrsto ptice: Kos; Črnoglavka; Plavček; Skobčevka; Kanarček; Ščinkavci; Nimfa; Turška grlica; Ščinkavec; Lišček; Velika sinica; Zelenec; Domači vrabec; Agapornis; Ara; Skobčevka; Papiga; Taščica; Čižek; Cikovt; Škorec; Drugo
de: Geeignet für diese Vogelart: Amsel; Mönchsgrasmücke; Blaumeise; Wellensittich; Kanarienvogel; Buchfink; Nymphensittich; Türkentaube; Fink; Stieglitz; Kohlmeise; Grünfink; Haussperling; Edelsittich; Ara; Sittich; Papagei; Rotkehlchen; Zeisig; Singdrossel; Star; Sonstiges
ja: 鳥の種類に適している: クロウタドリ; ブラックキャップ; アオガラ; セキセイインコ; カナリア; ズアオアトリ; オカメインコ; シラコバト; フィンチ; ゴシキヒワ; シジュウカラ; カワラヒワ; スズメ; ラブバード; コンゴウインコ; インコ; オウム; ロビン; マヒワ; ウタツグミ; ムクドリ; その他
ru: Для какого вида птиц: Черный дрозд; Черноголовый чернечик; Синица лазоревка; Волнистый попугайчик; Канарейка; Зяблик; Корелла; Кольчатая горлица; Вьюрок; Щегол; Большая синица; Зеленушка; Домовый воробей; Неразлучник; Ара; Длиннохвостый попугай; Попугай; Малиновка; Чиж; Певчий дрозд; Скворец; Другое
zh-TW: 適用鳥類類型: 烏鶇; 黑頭鶯; 藍山雀; 虎皮鸚鵡; 金絲雀; 蒼頭燕雀; 玄鳳鸚鵡; 灰斑鳩; 雀科鳴鳥; 金翅雀; 大山雀; 綠翅雀; 麻雀; 愛情鳥; 金剛鸚鵡; 長尾小鸚鵡; 鸚鵡; 歌鴝; 黃雀; 歌鶇; 椋鳥; 其他
hr-HR: Vrsta ptice za koju je prikladno: Tetrijeb; Crnokapa; Plavetna sjenica; Tigrica; Kanarinac; Zeba bitkavica; Nimfa; Gugutka; Zeba; Češljugar; Velika sjenica; Zelendur; Domaći vrabac; Agapornis; Makao; Mali papagaj; Papiga; Crvendać; Čižak; Drozd cikelj; Čvorak; Ostalo
el: Κατάλληλο για τύπο πουλιού: Κότσυφας; Μαυροσκούφος; Μπλε στήθος; Budgie; Καναρίνι; Σπίνος; Cockatiel; Περιστέρι με γιακά; Σπίνος; Καρδερίνα; Υπέροχο βυζιάκι; Φλώρος; Σπιτικό σπουργίτι; Lovebird; Μακώ; Είδος παπαγάλου; Παπαγάλος; Κοκκινολαίμης; Σίσκιν; Τραγούδι τσίχλα; Ψαρόνι; Άλλο
bg-BG: Подходящ за тип птица: Черен кос; Голямо черноглаво коприварче; Син синигер; Вълнист папагал; Канарче; Обикновена чинка; Корела; Гугутка; Чинка; Кадънка; Голям синигер; Зеленика; Домашно врабче; Неразделка; Ара; Дългоопашат папагал; Папагал; Червеногръдка; Елшова скатия; Поен дрозд; Скорец; Други
fi: Soveltuu lintutyypille: Mustarastas; Mustapääkerttu; Sinitiainen; Undulaatti; Kanarianlintu; Peippo; Neitokakadu; Kauluskyyhkynen; Peippo; Kultatippo; Talitiainen; Viherpeippo; Varpunen; Kaijaset; Ara; Kaija; Papukaija; Rastas; Varpunen; Laulurastas; Kottarainen; Muu
hu: Madártípus: Feketerigó; Barátposzáta; Kék cinege; Hullámos papagáj; Kanári; Erdei pinty; Nimfapapagáj; Balkáni gerle; Pinty; Tengelice; Nagy cinege; Zöldike; Házi veréb; Törpepapagáj; Ara; Törpepapagáj; Papagáj; Vörösbegy; Csíz; Énekes rigó; Seregély; Egyéb
ko: 적합한 조류: 검은새; 검은머리꾀꼬리; 푸른박새; 사랑앵무; 카나리아; 채핀치; 왕관앵무; 염주비둘기; 핀치; 오색방울새; 박새; 방울새; 집참새; 모란앵무; 마코앵무새; 잉꼬; 앵무새; 울새; 검은방울새; 노래지빠귀; 찌르레기; 기타
lt-LT: Tinka paukščių rūšiai: Juodvarnis; Juodagalvė devynbalsė; Mėlynoji zylė; Banguotoji papūgėlė; Kanarėlė; Kikilis; Nimfinė papūgėlė; Pietinis purplelis; Kikilis; Alksninukas; Didžioji zylė; Žaliukė; Naminis žvirblis; Agapornis; Ara; Papūga; Papūginiai paukščiai; Paprastoji liepsnelė; Alksninukas; Strazdas giesmininkas; Varnėnas; Kita
sk-SK: Vhodné pre typ vtákov: Drozd; Penica; Sýkorka belasá; Papagájec; Kanárik; Pinka obyčajná; Korela; Hrdlička; Pinka; Stehlík; Sýkorka veľká; Zelienka; Vrabec domový; Apagornis; Ara; Ladniak Kramerov; Papagáj; Červienka; Stehlík čížik; Drozd spevavý; Škorec; Iné
cs: Vhodný typ ptáka: Kos černý; Pěnice černohlavá; Sýkora modřinka; Andulka; Kanárek; Pěnkava; Korela; Hrdlička zahradní; Pěnkava; Stehlík; Sýkora koňadra; Zvonek zelený; Vrabec domácí; Papoušík; Papoušek Ara; Druh papouška; Papoušek; Červenka; Čížek; Drozd; Špaček; Jiné
pl: Typ odpowiedni dla ptaków: Blackbird; Blackcap; Sikora modra; Budgie; Mozga kanaryjska; Zięba zwyczajna; Nimfa; Synogarlica turecka; Zięba; Szczygieł; Sikorka bogatka; Dzwoniec; Wróbel domowy; Agapornis; Ara; Papuga długoogonowa; Papuga; Rudzik; Czyżyk; Śpiewak; Szpak; Pozostałe